Massachusetts, session 194th, H288.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary,
the department of transitional assistance shall allow funds deposited by a recipient of cash
assistance under transitional aid to families with dependent children in an account designated in a
child’s name intended to pay for higher education such as a children’s savings account or other
long-term asset-building account established for a child and annually grown over the course of
his or her lifetimes to accumulate assets outside of the asset limit in said accounts. The funds
deposited in said accounts shall be used to help recipients save for the costs related to higher
education or any other expense that the department determines will aid a recipient. The funds
deposited in said accounts shall not be included as a countable asset under 106 CMR 204.120.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2